Hawaii statutes.
§431:10-208 Limitations on use of
application as evidence. (a) No application for the issuance of any life
insurance contract shall be admissible in evidence in any action relative to
such contract, unless a true copy of the application was attached to or made a
part of the policy when issued and delivered. A copy or reproduction of the
application or medical examination, if any, may be used if clearly legible.
This subsection shall not apply to contracts of industrial life insurance.

(b) If any policy of life insurance or
accident and health or sickness insurance delivered in this State is reinstated
or renewed, and the insured or the beneficiary or assignee of the policy makes
written request to the insurer for a copy of the application for reinstatement
or renewal, within thirty days of receipt of such request at any of its
offices, the insurer shall deliver or mail a copy of the application to the
person making the request. If the copy is not so delivered or mailed, the
insurer shall be precluded from introducing the application as evidence in any
action or proceeding based upon or involving the policy or its reinstatement or
renewal.

(c) No application for insurance signed by the
insurer shall be admissible in evidence in any action between the insured and
the insurer arising out of the policy applied for, if the insurer fails to
furnish the insured a copy of the application, reproduced by any legible means,
within thirty days after receipt by the insurer of insured's written demand for
a copy. This subsection also applies in instances when the application is
signed on behalf of the insured and the reproduction request is made on behalf
of the insured. This subsection shall not apply to life insurance contracts.
[L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 2002, c 155, §43]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next